Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5209
Comprehensive dentistry program; funding.

Funding for the comprehensive dentistry program shall be provided in the manner set forth in section 71-5203.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 9.